Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.272

Public transportation systems—Definitions.

"Municipality" as used in *RCW 35.58.272 through 35.58.279, as now or hereafter amended, and in RCW 36.57.080, 36.57.100, 36.57.110, 35.58.2721, 35.58.2794, and chapter 36.57A RCW, means any metropolitan municipal corporation which shall have been authorized to perform the function of metropolitan public transportation; any county performing the public transportation function as authorized by RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 or which has established a county transportation authority pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW; any public transportation benefit area established pursuant to chapter 36.57A RCW; and any city, which is not located within the boundaries of a metropolitan municipal corporation unless provided otherwise in RCW 35.21.925 and 36.73.180, county transportation authority, or public transportation benefit area, and which owns, operates or contracts for the services of a publicly owned or operated system of transportation: PROVIDED, That the term "municipality" shall mean in respect to any county performing the public transportation function pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 only that portion of the unincorporated area lying wholly within such unincorporated transportation benefit area.

"Motor vehicle" as used in *RCW 35.58.272 through 35.58.279, as now or hereafter amended, shall have the same meaning as in RCW 82.44.010.

"County auditor" shall mean the county auditor of any county or any person designated to perform the duties of a county auditor pursuant to RCW 82.44.140.

"Person" shall mean any individual, corporation, firm, association or other form of business association.

[ 2010 c 251 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.58.273 through 35.58.279 were repealed by 2002 c 6 s 2.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 270: "If any provision of this 1975 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 30.]

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 270: "This 1975 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1975." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 31.]

Construction—1969 ex.s. c 255: "The powers and authority conferred upon municipalities under the provisions of this 1969 act shall be in addition to and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein limits any other power or authority of such municipalities." [ 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 21.]

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 255: "If any provision of this 1969 act, or its application to any municipality, person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this 1969 act or the application of the provisions to other municipalities, persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 22.]

Contracts between political subdivisions for services and use of public transportation systems: RCW 39.33.050.